Louisiana, session 2026, HB45.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2213(10), 2221(N), 2225.5(B)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (2)
and (C), 2241.5(A), and 2242.5(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:2218(K),
2220.1, 2221(G)(6), (K)(5), and (O), 2225.5(B)(3) and (4), 2241.5(D), 2242.5(D), and
2242.9 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2213. Definitions
The following words and phrases, as used in this Chapter, unless a different
meaning is plainly required by context, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(10)(a) "Earnable compensation" shall mean the full amount of
compensation earned by an employee for a given month, including supplemental pay
paid by the state of Louisiana, but shall not include overtime.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, "earnable compensation" shall not include any
nonrecurring lump-sum payment or ad hoc bonus, including but not limited to
recruitment incentives, hiring or signing bonuses, retention incentives or bonuses,
clothing allowance, and any other one-time award not paid as part of the employee's
regular recurring salary.
(c) For the purpose of calculating retirement benefits, for any nonrecurring
lump-sum payment or ad hoc bonus, including but not limited to recruitment
incentives, hiring or signing bonuses, retention incentives or bonuses, clothing
allowance, and any other one-time award not paid as part of the employee's regular
recurring salary made on or after January 1, 2026, and on or before July 1, 2026,
such non-recurring lump-sum payments or ad hoc bonuses shall not be used in the
calculation of retirement benefits unless the employer and employee contributions
for such lump-sum payments or ad hoc bonuses are remitted to the Municipal Police
Employees' Retirement System no later than June 30, 2026. Any retirement
contributions on such non-recurring lump-sum payments and ad hoc bonuses
retained by an employer and not remitted to the retirement system shall be returned
to the employee by the employer. If no contributions were received by the employer
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
from the employee, the employer shall not be responsible for remitting money to the
employee.
* * *
§2218. Creditable service
* * *
K.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any member of
this system who was employed by any other law enforcement agency of the state of
Louisiana or any political subdivision thereof, if such service is not creditable in any
public retirement or pension system, fund, or plan in the state, may purchase service
credit in this system by paying all actuarial costs of such purchase as determined by
the retirement system actuary in accordance with R.S. 11:158(C). The member shall
pay the cost of such service credit either in a lump sum, or the member may enter
into an installment agreement with the system, on terms established by the system,
for payments over a period not to exceed sixty months, inclusive of interest at the
actuarially assumed rate of return. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any outstanding
balance shall be paid in full no later than thirty days prior to the member's effective
retirement date or the date on which the member first receives a benefit from the
system, whichever is earlier.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person who
has at least six months of service credit in this system and who was employed by any
law enforcement agency of the federal government or of any other state or of any
political subdivision of another state where such service is not creditable in any
public retirement or pension system, fund, or plan, in this or any other state or of the
federal government, may purchase service credit in this system for such employment
by paying all actuarial costs of such purchase as determined by the retirement system
actuary, in accordance with R.S. 11:158(C) and as further provided in this Paragraph.
(b) To purchase credit for such service, the member shall apply to the system
and furnish with such application information on the name and address of each
retirement or pension system, plan, or fund in which the member was enrolled during
the out-of-state or federal law enforcement employment, together with the dates of
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
such employment. The appropriate officer, trustee, or employee of each system,
plan, or fund, or of the out-of-state or federal employing agency shall certify the
length of employment of the member and that the member does not have retirement
or pension credit for such employment which duplicates the service credit being
purchased in the system.
(c) The cost of such service credit shall be paid in a lump sum, or the
member may enter into an installment agreement with the system, on terms
established by the system, for payments over a period not to exceed sixty months,
inclusive of interest at the actuarially assumed rate of return. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, any outstanding balance shall be paid in full no later than thirty days prior
to the member's effective retirement date or the date on which the member is to first
receive a benefit from the system, whichever is earlier.
* * *
§2220.1. Survivor benefits for officers killed in the line of duty; failure of employer
enrollment
A. Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, a surviving
spouse or other eligible beneficiary of an employee as defined in R.S. 11:2213(11)
who was killed in the line of duty while employed as a municipal police officer on
or after July 1, 2010, and before March 1, 2026, may apply for survivor benefits
under this Chapter no later than June 30, 2027, if the employee otherwise met the
eligibility requirements for membership in the system at the time of death.
B. If the surviving spouse or beneficiary otherwise qualifies for survivor
benefits, the system shall pay such benefits notwithstanding the failure of the
employer to enroll the officer in the system at the time of death. Any person who
would have been eligible to receive a benefit but whose benefit payments would
have ceased before the effective date of this Section shall be paid the benefits to
which the person would have been entitled.
C. Any actuarial cost associated with benefits paid pursuant to this Section
shall be funded with additional employer contributions.
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
D. Any retroactive benefits payable pursuant to this Section shall be paid no
later than three months after the system determines that the applicant is eligible.
* * *
§2221. Deferred Retirement Option Plan
* * *
G.
* * *
(6) In the case of any conflict between the provisions of this Subsection and
Subsection N of this Section, the provisions of Subsection N of this Section shall
control.
* * *
K. The following shall also apply if employment is not terminated at the end
of the period of participation:
* * *
(5)(a) A participant who had twenty-eight or more years of creditable service
upon commencement of participation in the plan, who elected a participation period
of three years before July 1, 2024, and who thereafter resumed active contributing
membership in the system pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, may elect
upon subsequent retirement to receive the additional retirement benefit payable
under Paragraph (3) of this Subsection as an initial benefit plus a reduced monthly
retirement allowance equal to the actuarially equivalent amount of his maximum
additional retirement benefit.
(b) The initial benefit shall not exceed twenty-four payments of the monthly
retirement benefit that was being paid into the participant's Deferred Retirement
Option Plan account upon termination of participation in the plan.
(c) The participant, at his option, shall receive the initial benefit as a lump-
sum payment or in an investment account established and administered under this
Section.
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
(d) The additional benefit received by the participant and the beneficiary or
survivor shall be actuarially reduced by a prorated amount calculated to offset the
cost of the initial benefit payment.
(e) Cost of living adjustments shall not be payable on the initial benefit.
* * *
N.(1)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary and
as further provided in this Paragraph, the board of trustees may adopt rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to provide for amounts credited
to Deferred Retirement Option Plan accounts, including amounts credited after
termination of participation in the plan, to be retained and invested by the system.
The rules shall apply to any person whose plan participation begins on or after
July 1, 2026; provided, however, that if the rules authorized by this Paragraph have
not been promulgated by the date a person's participation period ends, the person's
account shall be transferred as provided in Subparagraph (G)(5)(b) of this Section.
(b) The board of trustees may adopt rules for the transfer to the system, at
the option of the participant, of amounts previously credited to Deferred Retirement
Option Plan accounts that are invested outside of the system, including amounts held
by third-party providers or in externally managed funds.
(c) For any person subject to the provisions of this Subsection, after the
person's plan participation ceases, any amounts retained or transferred pursuant to
the rules promulgated as authorized in this Paragraph shall earn interest, credited
annually, at a rate equal to the actuarial rate of return of the system's investment
portfolio for the applicable fiscal year, less one-half of one percent, as certified in the
system's actuary's annual valuation report.
(d) The board of trustees may adopt rules governing eligibility, timing of
transfers, administration, valuation dates, crediting periods, administrative fees, and
any other matters necessary to implement the provisions of this Paragraph. Any rule
adopted pursuant to this Paragraph shall apply prospectively only.
(2) Any member electing a participation period in the Deferred Retirement
Option Plan that begins on or after July 1, 2026, shall, by such election, be deemed
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
to have knowingly and voluntarily waived any rights or claims under the
Constitution of Louisiana relative to the benefits credited or the interest earned on
amounts credited to the participant's Deferred Retirement Option Plan account,
including any claim to a guaranteed rate of return or to any particular method of
investment or crediting of interest. The waiver provided by this Paragraph shall
apply to all amounts credited to the participant's Deferred Retirement Option Plan
account, whether credited during or after participation in the plan, and regardless of
whether such amounts are retained and invested by the system or transferred
pursuant to law or rules adopted by the board of trustees.
O. The board of trustees shall promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to approve any other methods of payment authorized
by but not expressly provided in this Section. Once promulgated, the rules shall be
considered plan provisions for purposes of compliance with requirements of the
Internal Revenue Code and associated regulations.
* * *
§2225.5. Funding deposit account
* * *
B.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of R.S. 11:103 or 104, for fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 2023, and ending on or before June 30, 2028, the board
of trustees may require a net direct contribution rate of up to the following applicable
limit:
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of R.S. 11:103 or 104, for fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 2028, the board of trustees may require a net direct
contribution rate of up to the rate determined under R.S. 11:103 plus the applicable
benefit rate as determined under Subparagraphs (3)(c) and (d) of this Subsection.
(3)(a) Effective July 1, 2027, the funding deposit account rate shall be
eighty-five hundredths of one percentage point.
(b) For any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, in which the rate
determined under R.S. 11:103 decreases, the funding deposit account rate shall
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
increase by one-half of the amount of the decrease in the rate determined under R.S.
11:103. Any increase in the funding deposit account rate shall be permanent, and the
adjusted funding deposit account rate shall not exceed two and one-half percent.
(c) For any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, in which the sum
of the rate determined under R.S. 11:103 and the funding deposit account rate
determined pursuant to Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph does not exceed twenty-
nine and thirty-five hundredths percent, the applicable benefit rate shall be equal to
the funding deposit account rate determined pursuant to Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph.
(d) For any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, in which the sum
of the rate determined under R.S. 11:103 and the funding deposit account rate
determined pursuant to Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph exceeds twenty-nine and
thirty-five hundredths percent, the applicable benefit rate shall be equal to eighty-
five hundredths of one percentage point or the difference between twenty-nine and
thirty-five hundredths percent and the rate determined under R.S. 11:103, whichever
is greater.
(4)(a) For any fiscal year ending on or before June 30, 2028, in which the
board of trustees sets the direct employer contribution rate higher than the rate
determined under R.S. 11:103, excess contributions resulting from the higher rate
shall be used as provided in Paragraph (C)(1) of this Section or transferred to the
account as provided in Paragraph (C)(2) of this Section.
(b) For any fiscal year, beginning on or after July 1, 2028, in which the board
of trustees sets the direct employer contribution rate higher than the rate determined
under R.S. 11:103, excess contributions resulting from the higher rate shall be
credited to the account to be used solely to pay additional benefits to retirees,
survivors, and beneficiaries.
C.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, any excess
contributions for any fiscal year ending on or before June 30, 2028, resulting from
the board's exercise of its authority pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall
be applied, until exhausted, exclusively to reduce the outstanding balance of the
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
oldest positive amortization base; however, the future payments for such
amortization base shall continue to be made according to the original amortization
schedule established in compliance with the requirements of Article X, Section
29(E)(3) of the Constitution of Louisiana and R.S. 11:103 until the outstanding
balance is fully liquidated.
(2) The For any fiscal year ending on or before June 30, 2028, the board of
trustees may dedicate a specific amount of excess contributions, up to the amount
generated by setting the rate equal to eighty-five hundredths of one percentage point
more than the rate determined under R.S. 11:103, to be used solely to pay additional
benefits to retirees, survivors, and beneficiaries. The dedicated amount of funds
shall be credited to the account.
* * *
§2241.5. Retirement benefit calculation
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, a member shall
receive a retirement benefit equal to three percent of average final compensation for
every year of creditable service in this subplan credited before to January 1, 2027,
and three and one-third percent of average final compensation for every year of
creditable service in this subplan credited on or after January 1, 2027, not to exceed
one hundred percent of the member's average final compensation. Notwithstanding
this provision, a member who retires with thirty or more years of creditable service
shall receive a retirement benefit equal to three and one-third percent of the
member's average final compensation for every year of creditable service in this
subplan, not to exceed one hundred percent of the member's average final
compensation.
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a member of this
subplan may elect to purchase an increase in the accrual rate applicable to any period
of creditable service in this subplan that was credited at the rate of three percent of
the average final compensation, so that such service is subject to the rate of three and
one-third percent of the average final compensation.
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
(2) The cost of such purchase shall be an amount calculated on an actuarial
basis which totally offsets the increase in accrued liability resulting from the
application of the higher accrual rate. The cost shall be determined by the system
actuary using the actuarial assumptions and methods in use by the system at the time
of the member's election.
(3) No purchase authorized by this Subsection shall be effective until the full
actuarial cost is paid by the member. The cost of the purchase shall be borne solely
by the member and shall not be paid, directly or indirectly, by the employer or the
system.
* * *
§2242.5. Retirement benefit calculation
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, a member shall
receive a retirement benefit equal to two and one-half percent of average final
compensation for every year of creditable service in this subplan credited before
January 1, 2027, and three percent of average final compensation for every year of
creditable service in this subplan credited on or after January 1, 2027, not to exceed
one hundred percent of the member's average final compensation.
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a member of this
subplan may elect to purchase an increase in the accrual rate applicable to any period
of creditable service in this subplan that was credited at the rate of two and one-half
percent of the average final compensation, so that such service is subject to the rate
of three percent of average final compensation.
(2) The cost of such purchase shall be an amount calculated on an actuarial
basis which totally offsets the increase in accrued liability resulting from the
application of the higher accrual rate. The cost shall be determined by the system
actuary using the actuarial assumptions and methods in use by the system at the time
of the member's election.
(3) No purchase authorized by this Subsection shall be effective until the full
actuarial cost is paid by the member. The cost of the purchase shall be borne solely
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
by the member and shall not be paid, directly or indirectly, by the employer or the
system.
* * *
§2242.9. Certain employees previously electing membership in the Louisiana State
Employees' Retirement System
A. Any person who made an election pursuant to R.S. 11:160 to remain a
member of the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System and who on
December 31, 2026, is employed in a position that would otherwise qualify him to
be a member of the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System shall,
beginning January 1, 2027, become a member of the Municipal Police Employees'
Retirement System.
B. All service in the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System of a
person subject to the provisions of Subsection A of this Section shall be transferred
in accordance with R.S. 11:143(C), and upon receipt of the amount required pursuant
to R.S. 11:143(C), the member shall receive his service credit.
C. All service credit transferred pursuant to this Section shall be deemed
creditable service in the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System for
purposes of benefit computation and eligibility.
Section 2. There shall exist no right or claim for reimbursement against the
Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System or against any employer or municipality
for any amounts deducted, paid, or otherwise payable, on or before the effective date of this
Act, from the earnable compensation of a member of the system from any nonrecurring
lump-sum payment or ad hoc bonus, including but not limited to recruitment incentives,
hiring or signing bonuses, retention incentives or bonuses, clothing allowance, and any other
one-time award not paid as part of the employee's regular recurring salary. To the maximum
extent permitted by law, the system and any employer or municipality shall be immune from
suit or other financial liability from the payment of any nonrecurring lump-sum payment or
ad hoc bonus without the deductions on earnable compensation pursuant to R.S.
11:2227(B)(1)(a).
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 45 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.